Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-204
Forms.

(MBCA 1.21) (a) The Secretary of State may
prescribe and furnish on request forms for (1) an application for a certificate
of existence, (2) a foreign corporation's application for a certificate of
authority to transact business in this state, and (3) a foreign corporation's
application for a certificate of withdrawal. If the Secretary of State so
requires, use of these forms is mandatory.

(b) The Secretary of State
may prescribe and furnish on request forms for other documents required or
permitted to be filed by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act but their
use is not mandatory.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 4.